Utah statutes.
57-14-203.   Land leased to state or political subdivision for recreational purposes.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, Sections 57-14-201 and 57-14-202 are applicable to the duties and liability of an owner of land leased to the state or any subdivision of the state for recreational purposes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2013 General Session

